District of Columbia statutes.
47-2855.04

Rules; fees.

(a)

The Mayor shall adopt rules as necessary to administer this subchapter. The rules may include the specifying of forms and the setting of fees for trade name registrations, amendments, searches, renewals, and copies of registration documents.

(b)

Fees set pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall not exceed the actual cost of administering this title [subchapter]; provided, that

(1)

For expedited same-day service, there shall be a fee of $100 in addition to other fees required by statute or rule;

(2)

For expedited 3-day service, there shall be a fee of $50 in addition to other fees required by statute or rule.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2005(b), 46 DCR 3142
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2041(d), 57 DCR 181
1981 Ed., § 47-2855.4.
D.C. Law 18-111 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “The Mayor shall adopt rules as necessary to administer this subchapter. The rules may include the specifying of forms and the setting of fees for trade name registrations, amendments, searches, renewals, and copies of registration documents. Fees shall not exceed the actual cost of administering this subchapter.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2041(d) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2041(d) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Short title of title II of Law 12-261: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2855.01.
Delegation of Rulemaking Authority Pursuant to DC Law 12-261, the Business Regulatory Reform Act of 1998, see Mayor’s Order 2001-123, August 9, 2001 ( 48 DCR 7814).